Washington statutes.
RCW 15.61.020

Intergovernmental cooperation.

The director of agriculture may cooperate and enter into agreements with governmental agencies, other states, and agencies of the federal government to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 1963 c 232 s 11.]